Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5252
Restricted network provision, defined.

Restricted network provision shall mean any provision of a health benefit plan that conditions the payment of benefits, in whole or in part, on the use of health care providers that have entered into contractual arrangement with the carrier to provide health care services to covered individuals.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 30.